Washington statutes.
RCW 35.102.020

Limited scope—Utility businesses.

Chapter 79, Laws of 2003 does not apply to taxes on any service that historically or traditionally has been taxed as a utility business for municipal tax purposes, such as:

(1) A light and power business or a natural gas distribution business, as defined in RCW 82.16.010;

(2) A telephone business, as defined in RCW 82.16.010;

(3) Cable television services;

(4) Sewer or water services;

(5) Drainage services;

(6) Solid waste services; or

(7) Steam services.

[ 2007 c 6 s 1021; 2003 c 79 s 2.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—Savings—Effective date—Severability—2007 c 6: See notes following RCW 82.32.020.

Findings—Intent—2007 c 6: See note following RCW 82.14.390.